Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [123B.035] COMMUNITY VOLUNTEERS; READING. new text end new text begin To the extent space and supervisory staff are available, a school district or charter school must provide space at the school site before or after the school day, on days when students receive instruction, for community volunteers to support students in developing key reading skills. Community reading volunteers may read books to students, listen to students read aloud, or help students select books to read from the school library. Each volunteer must complete a background check under section 123B.03 and must be under the supervision and control of the school principal, or the school principal's designee, while present on school property. new text end